Hawaii statutes.
[§103F-107] Medicaid contracts; nonprofits
and for-profits; reporting requirements. (a) All nonprofit or for-profit
medicaid healthcare insurance contractors, within one hundred and eighty days
following the close of each fiscal year, shall submit an annual report to the
department of human services, the insurance division of the department of
commerce and consumer affairs, and the legislature. The report shall be
attested to by a plan executive located within the State and shall be made
accessible to the public.

The report shall be based on contracts
administered in the State and shall include:

(1) An accounting of expenditures of MedQuest
contract payments for the contracted services, including the percentage of
payments:

(A) For medical services;

(B) For administrative costs;

(C) Held in reserve; and

(D) Paid to shareholders;

(2) Employment information including:

(A) Total number of full-time employees hired
for the contracted services;

(B) Total number of employees located in the
State and the category of work performed; and

(C) The compensation provided to each of the
five highest paid Hawaii employees and to each of the five highest paid
employees nationwide, and a description of each position;

(3) Descriptions of any ongoing state or federal
sanction proceedings, prohibitions, restrictions, ongoing civil or criminal
investigations, and descriptions of past sanctions or resolved civil or
criminal cases, within the past five years and related to the provision of
medicare or medicaid services by the contracting entity, to the extent allowed
by law;

(4) Descriptions of contributions to the community,
including the percentage of revenue devoted to Hawaii community development
projects and health enhancements; provided that contracted services shall not
be included in the percentage calculation; and

(5) A list of any management and administrative
service contracts for MedQuest services made in Hawaii and outside of the State,
including a description of the purpose and cost of those contracts.

(b) The department of human services shall
include in all medicaid healthcare insurance plan contracts, the annual
reporting requirements of subsection (a).

(c) Any contract under this section shall be
governed by the laws of the State of Hawaii.

(d) Within ninety days of receipt of the
reports required by this section, the department of human services shall
provide a written analysis and comparative report to the legislature. [L Sp
2009, c 12, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next